Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1128.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Fuel Gas Detector Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commercial building." A building used for a business activity, office, manufacturing, public accommodation, storage, warehousing or other nonresidential purpose. The term includes a factory and other building used for an industrial purpose."Dwelling." A building that contains one or more dwelling units that are or will be rented, leased, let or hired out for 123456789101112131415161718 living purposes."Fuel gas detector." A device that:(1) is battery-powered or plugged into an electrical outlet or hardwired;(2) incorporates a sensor control component and an alarm notification that detects elevations in propane, natural gas or any liquefied petroleum gas;(3) sounds a warning alarm; and(4) meets Underwriters Laboratories Standard 1484 or 2075, as applicable, as the standards are published as of the effective date of this paragraph."Residential building." A dwelling, single-family home, multifamily home, a mixed-use building that contains a dwelling, manufactured home, dormitory or other residential structure affiliated with an institution of higher learning, hotel, motel, inn, hospital, medical facility that houses patients or other residential structure.Section 3. Residential buildings.In accordance with section 7, the owner of a single-family or multifamily home shall install, upon the transfer of property or change of occupancy, at least one fuel gas detector in any room containing an appliance that combusts propane, natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas if fuel gas detectors are not already present. An owner of any other residential buildings, with the exception of dwellings under section 5, shall install fuel gas detectors in accordance with this act. A fuel gas detector shall be installed in accordance with the manufacturer's requirements and the National Fire Protection Association 715 Standard, as that standard is published as of the effective date of this section.20260SB1128PN1384 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Commercial buildings.The owner of a commercial building shall install, or cause to be installed, in accordance with the manufacturer's requirements and the National Fire Protection Association 715 Standard, as that standard is published as of the effective date of this section, fuel gas detectors in any room that contains an appliance that combusts propane, natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas, or in other areas that could be susceptible to a propane, natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas leak, if fuel gas detectors are not already present.Section 5. Dwellings.The following requirements apply to a dwelling:(1) At the time of each occupancy, the landlord shall provide fuel gas detectors in accordance with section 3, if fuel gas detectors are not already present. Each fuel gas detector must be in working condition. After notification in writing by the tenant of any deficiency in a fuel gas detector, the landlord shall repair or replace the fuel gas detector. If the landlord did not know and had not been notified of the need to repair or replace a fuel gas detector, the landlord's failure to repair or replace the fuel gas detector may not be considered evidence of negligence in a subsequent civil action arising from death, property loss or personal injury.(2) The tenant shall keep the fuel gas detector connected to the electrical service in the building or, if battery-operated, keep charged batteries in the fuel gas detector, and shall test the fuel gas detector periodically and refrain from disabling the fuel gas detector.Section 6. Municipal enforcement.20260SB1128PN1384 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A municipality shall enforce this act, have the right to inspect buildings and levy penalties for violations of this act.Section 7. Transfer of building.(a) Duties.--An owner of a residential building shall install fuel gas detectors in accordance with section 3 in the acquired building within 30 days of acquisition or occupancy of the building, whichever is later, if fuel gas detectors are not already present. If fuel gas detectors in accordance with section 3 are not already present, the person acquiring the building shall certify at the closing of the transaction that fuel gas detectors will be installed. A fuel gas detector must be installed in accordance with the manufacturer's requirements and National Fire Protection Association 715 Standard, as that standard is published as of the effective date of this section, at the time of installation in each area containing an appliance fueled by propane, natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas.(b) Liability.--A person may not have a claim for relief against a property owner, a property purchaser, an authorized agent of a property owner or purchaser, a person in possession of real property, a closing agent or a lender for any damages resulting from the operation, maintenance or effectiveness of a fuel gas detector. Violation of this subsection does not create a defect in title.Section 8. Civil penalties.A person who violates this act shall be subject to a civil fine of not more than $500 for each violation. The municipality in which the violation occurred may impose the fine and may waive the penalty upon satisfactory proof that the violation was corrected within 10 days of notice of the violation.Section 9. Liability.20260SB1128PN1384 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 An owner required to comply with section 3 or 5 is not subject to liability under law of this Commonwealth if the owner:(1) has conducted an inspection of the required fuel gas detectors immediately after installation; and(2) has reinspected the fuel gas detectors prior to occupancy by each new tenant, unless the owner was given at least 24 hours' actual notice of a defect or failure of the fuel gas detector to operate properly and failed to take action to correct the defect or failure.Section 10. Noninterference.A person may not knowingly interfere with or make inoperative a fuel gas detector required by this act.Section 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.20260SB1128PN1384 - 5 - 123456789101112131415